it: Tipo di punta della spada: Allstar; Cinese; FWF; Tedesco; Titanio; Unic; Altro
da: Kårdespidsform: Allstar; Kinesisk; FWF; Tysk; Titanium; Unic; Andet
zh-TW: 銳劍劍尖類型: Allstar; 中國式; FWF; 德國式; 鈦金屬; Unic; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de ponta de espada: Allstar; Chinês; FWF; Alemão; Titânio; Unic; Outro
el: Τύπος μύτης ξίφους ξιφασκίας: Allstar; Κινεζικό; FWF; Γερμανικό; Τιτανίου; Unic; Άλλο
de: Art der Degenspitze: Allstar; Chinesisch; FWF; Deutsch; Titan; Unic; Sonstige
zh-CN: 击剑剑尖类型: Allstar; 中式; FWF; 德式; 钛; Unic; 其他
th: ประเภทของปลายดาบเอเป้: Allstar; Chinese; FWF; German; Titanium; Unic; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul vârfului de spadă: Allstar; Chinezesc; FWF; German; Titan; Unic; Altele
ru: Тип наконечника шпаги: Allstar; Китайский; FWF; Немецкий; Титановый; Unic; Другое
hu: Párbajtőr hegyének típusa: Allstar; Kínai; FWF; Német; Titán; Unic; Egyéb
nl: Degenpunt type: Allstar; Chinees; FWF; Duits; Titanium; Unic; Overig
en: Epee point type: Allstar; Chinese; FWF; German; Titanium; Unic; Other
fi: Kalpakärjen tyyppi: Allstar; Kiinalainen; FWF; Saksalainen; Titaani; Unic; Muu
sv: Spetstyp för värja: Allstar; Kinesisk; FWF; Tysk; Titan; Unic; Annat
hr-HR: Vrsta vrha mača: Allstar; Kineski; FWF; Njemački; Titanij; Unic; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de ponta de espada: Allstar; Chinês; FWF; Alemão; Titânio; Unic; Outro
pl: Typ końcówki szpady: Allstar; Chiński; FWF; Niemiecki; Tytanowy; Unic; Inne
sk-SK: Typ hrotu kordu: Allstar; Čínsky; FWF; Nemecký; Titánový; Unic; Iné
es: Tipo de punta de espada: Allstar; Chino; FWF; Alemán; Titanio; Unic; Otro
ko: 에페 포인트 유형: Allstar; 중국형; FWF; 독일형; 티타늄; Unic; 기타
bg-BG: Тип връх за шпага: Allstar; Китайски; FWF; Немски; Титаниев; Unic; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta konice meča: Allstar; Kitajska; FWF; Nemška; Iz titana; Unic; Drugo
ja: エペのポイントタイプ: Allstar; 中国式; FWF; ドイツ式; チタン; Unic; その他
fr: Type de pointe d’épée: Allstar; Chinois; FWF; Allemand; Titane; Unic; Autre
tr: Epe ucu türü: Allstar; Çin; FWF; Alman; Titanyum; Unic; Diğer
vi: Loại mũi kiếm Epee: Allstar; Trung Quốc; FWF; Đức; Titanium; Unic; Khác
nb: Kårde-punkttype: Allstar; Kinesisk; FWF; Tysk; Titan; Unic; Annet
lt-LT: Špagos antgalio tipas: Allstar; Kiniškas; FWF; Vokiškas; Titano; Unic; Kita
cs: Typ hrotu kordu: Allstar; Čínský; FWF; Německý; Titanový; Unic; Jiné